Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 2 CONTROL OF WATER POLLUTION AND SURFACE-WATER USE
12-5-23.2. Waste-water discharge limitations; schedule of construction milestones; penalties.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Code Section 12-5-23 or any rule, regulation, or order adopted or issued pursuant to this article, no person who has been issued a National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit which allows the discharge of 1,000,000 gallons or more per day from a water pollution control plant operated by such person which discharges waste water into the Chattahoochee River between Buford Dam and West Point Reservoir shall discharge waste water from such person's water pollution control plants which contains more than 0.75 milligrams of phosphorus per liter of waste water on a monthly average basis or which fails to comply with any stricter standard adopted pursuant to Code Section 12-5-23.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section, any person who has been issued a National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit and who has entered into a finalized consent order shall conform to the schedule adopted in such order as such order appeared on April 25, 1996. Except as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, compliance with the discharge limitation provided by this Code section shall not be extended beyond July 4, 1996, and the order shall require that person to make his or her best efforts to achieve compliance with the discharge limitation by December 31, 1993.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of this Code section, any person who entered into a consent order as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section but fails to complete the required phosphorus reduction improvements by July 4, 1996, shall not later than such date submit to the division a schedule stipulating annual construction milestones for the completion of all improvements required to achieve a discharge level of 0.64 milligrams of phosphorus per liter of water at each of such person's individual waste-water plants by not later than January 1, 2001; provided, however, that such person shall not discharge waste water from such person's water pollution control plants after February 1, 1997, which exceeds 0.64 milligrams of phosphorus per liter of water.

If the director approves the schedule submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection, such person shall be bound by that schedule. If the director does not approve said schedule by August 1, 1996, the director shall not later than September 1, 1996, establish an alternative schedule with a final completion date not later than January 1, 2001, and such person shall be bound by the alternative schedule.

Any monetary penalties stipulated in any consent order regarding phosphorus effluent limitations executed by the director and another person prior to April 25, 1996, shall be the only monetary penalties required to be paid by such person as long as such person is in compliance with the construction milestones in the schedule approved or established by the director in paragraph (2) of this subsection; provided, however, that if such order is declared invalid by the courts, then the penalties for noncompliance with subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section shall be as provided for in Code Sections

12-5-51

through

12-5-53

.

If such person fails to meet a construction milestone, he or she shall pay a penalty in the amount of $25,000.00 per day until that construction milestone is met. If a particular construction milestone is not met for six months after the date specified, the penalty shall be increased to $100,000.00 per day until that construction milestone has been met. Failure to meet a construction milestone shall not affect the date of any succeeding construction milestones.

If the person fails to complete all required construction by January 1, 2001, he or she shall pay a civil penalty in the amount of $100,000.00 per day until construction is completed. After construction is completed, the suspension of the liabilities and penalties provided for in Code Sections

12-5-51

through

12-5-53

for noncompliance with the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be ended.

If in any month after July 1, 1996, and before December 31, 1998, a person discharges waste water from such person's water pollution control plants containing more than 0.75 milligrams of phosphorous per liter of water on a monthly average basis; or if in any month after January 1, 1999, and before December 31, 2000, a person discharges waste water from such person's water pollution control plants containing more than 0.64 milligrams of phosphorous per liter of water on a monthly average basis; or if in any month after January 1, 2001, a person discharges waste water from any individual water pollution control plant containing more than 0.64 milligrams of phosphorous per liter of water on a monthly average basis, such person shall not permit any additional sewer connections within such person's corporate limits until he or she has been in compliance with such provisions for three consecutive months. The provisions of this subsection shall apply without regard to the provisions of paragraphs (1) through (5) of this subsection and shall not be suspended or terminated; provided, however, that nothing in this paragraph shall prohibit additional sewer connections required for any project constructed by or in partnership with a public housing authority, as long as the additional connections for such project do not cause the total quantity of sewage generated to exceed the total quantity of sewage generated by that public housing authority's housing units in existence on January 1, 1995.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-23.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1042, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1618, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 607, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 12.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, "April 25, 1996" was substituted for "the date this subsection became effective" in subsection (b) and paragraph (c)(3); and "subsection" was substituted for "subsections" in paragraph (c)(3).

Law reviews.

-
For review of 1996 water resources legislation, see 13 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 60 (1996).

12-5-23.3. Privatization of waste-water treatment facilities.

For purposes of this Code section only, the term:

"LAS permit" means Land Application System permit.

"NPDES permit" means National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit.

"Waste-water treatment facilities" means all publicly owned facilities with average monthly flow limits of 20 million gallons per day or more that have been issued NPDES permits or LAS permits.

The director shall provide written notice to owners of all waste-water treatment facilities that the privatization requirements specified in subsection (c) of this Code section are in effect if the owner of such facility has violated its NPDES or LAS permit, or any interim conditions established by a federal court order, as follows:

A violation of the facility's monthly effluent limitation specified in the NPDES permit or conditions of a federal court order for biochemical oxygen demand, total suspended solids, ammonia, or phosphorus for any eight months during any continuous 12 month period starting on or after January 1, 1999;

A violation of the facility's monthly effluent limitation specified in the NPDES permit or conditions of a federal court order for biochemical oxygen demand, total suspended solids, ammonia, or phosphorus by a factor of 1.4 or greater for any four months during any continuous 12 month period, starting on or after January 1, 1999; or

Three major treatment facility bypasses during any continuous 12 month period starting on or after January 1, 1999. For purposes of this paragraph, the term "major treatment facility bypass" shall mean any diversion of waste water from or bypassing of waste water around the treatment facility, excluding sewer system overflows; provided, however, that this shall not include any bypass which is authorized by any NPDES or LAS permit or any bypass which is necessary to prevent loss of life, bodily injury, or severe property damage.

Within 12 months of receipt of written notification from the director in accordance with subsection (b) of this Code section, the owner shall enter into a binding contract with a private contractor for the operation and maintenance of the waste-water facility as follows:

The contractor shall be selected, and the contract shall be awarded, through competitive bidding, in accordance with the public procurement processes and procedures then in effect for the public owner or, at the option of the owner, through competitive bidding by the Department of Administrative Services in accordance with and as permitted by Part 2 of Article 3 of Chapter 5 of Title 50;

The scope of the contract shall include the operation and maintenance of the entire facility and sewer collection system, including combined sewer overflow treatment facilities, by the selected contractor;

Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, the term of the contract shall be not less than ten years nor more than 50 years; and

The contract shall meet all applicable state and local laws, rules, and regulations pertinent to the awarding, drafting, enforcement, and administration of such contract and shall contain such other contractual provisions as may be reasonably necessary for the effective enforcement and administration of the contract.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-23.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1115, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 12; Ga. L. 2006, p. 72, § 12/SB 465; Ga. L. 2008, p. 1015, § 5/SB 344.)

Law reviews.

-
For review of 1998 legislation relating to conservation and natural resources, see 15 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 29 (1998).

12-5-24. Power of director to enter into contracts and compacts regarding surface-water management.

The director is authorized to enter into contracts or compacts on behalf of the State of Georgia with the federal government, sister states, political subdivisions of this state, and public utilities of this state for purposes of proper management of the state's surface-water resources, provided that any such contract shall be subject to approval by the Board of Natural Resources; provided, further, that any such contract shall not grant to any person any right to use surface waters except to the extent such person would qualify for such use under the permitting system established pursuant to Code Section 12-5-31.

(Ga. L. 1977, p. 368, § 5.)

12-5-25. Investigations by division; institution of proceedings by division.

The division shall have authority to investigate any apparent violation of any provision of this article and to take any action authorized by this article which it deems necessary and may, after a public hearing has been provided, institute proceedings of mandamus or other proper legal proceedings to enforce this article.

(Ga. L. 1964, p. 416, § 14; Ga. L. 1971, p. 87, § 1.)

12-5-26. Entry on premises to investigate and inspect conditions and operating records; protection of trade secrets and confidential information.

Any duly appointed agent of the division may enter private or public property at reasonable times to inspect or investigate conditions relating to pollution and to inspect the operating records of any sewage system, waste treatment work, or sewage disposal plant, provided that no person shall be required to disclose any secret formula, process, or methods used in any manufacturing operations carried on by him or under his direction or any confidential information concerning business activities carried on by him or under his supervision.

(Ga. L. 1964, p. 416, § 16.)

12-5-27. Authority to require owner or operator of facility to cooperate with division.

Whenever required to carry out the objectives of this article, including but not limited to developing or assisting in the development of any effluent limitation, or other limitation, prohibition, or standard under this article, or any rule or regulation promulgated and adopted pursuant to this article; determining whether any person is in violation of any effluent limitation, or other limitation, prohibition, or standard under this article, or any rule or regulation promulgated and adopted pursuant to this article; or encouraging or ensuring compliance with any effluent limitation or other prohibition or standard under this article or any rule or regulation promulgated and adopted pursuant to this article, the director may, by order, permit, or otherwise in writing, require the owner or operator of a facility of any type which results in the discharge of pollutants into the waters of the state to:

Establish and maintain records;

Make reports;

Install, use, and maintain monitoring equipment or methods, including, where appropriate, biological monitoring methods;

Sample such discharge, in accordance with such methods, at such locations, at such intervals, and in such manner as the director shall prescribe; and

Provide such other information as he may reasonably require.

(Ga. L. 1974, p. 599, § 12.)

12-5-27.1. Sale or use of cleaning agents containing phosphorus.

The General Assembly seeks, through the enactment of this Code section, to set standards limiting the amount of nutrients in various cleaning agents. The General Assembly realizes that the nutrients contained in many of these products serve a valuable purpose in increasing their overall effectiveness, but the General Assembly is also aware that they overstimulate the growth of aquatic life and are causing, and will eventually lead to, an acceleration of the natural eutrophication process of our state's water resources which can result in a lower quality of life and thereby create an undesirable environment in which the citizens of the state would not want to live and do business. Limitations imposed under this Code section should, however, be made taking the following factors into consideration:

The availability of safe, nonpolluting substitutes; and

The differing needs of industrial, commercial, and household users of cleaning agents.

As used in this Code section, the term:

"Cleaning agent" means a laundry detergent, dishwashing compound, household cleaner, metal cleaner or polish, industrial cleaner, or other substance that is used or intended for use for cleaning purposes.

"Nutrient" means a substance or combination of substances which, if added to waters in sufficient quantities, provides nourishment that promotes growth of aquatic vegetation in densities which:

Interfere with use of the waters by humans or by any animal, fish, or plant useful to humans; or

Contribute to degradation or alteration of the quality of the waters to an extent detrimental to their use by humans or by any animal, fish, or plant that is useful to humans.

On or after January 1, 1991, it shall be unlawful to sell at retail or use in this state any cleaning agent containing phosphorus, except as otherwise provided in this Code section.

This Code section shall not apply to cleaning agents which are used:

In agricultural or dairy production;

To clean commercial food or beverage processing equipment or containers;

As industrial sanitizers, metal brighteners, or acid cleaners, including those containing phosphoric acid or trisodium phosphate;

In industrial processes for metal, fabric, or fiber cleaning and conditioning;

In hospitals, clinics, nursing homes, other health care facilities, or veterinary hospitals or clinics;

By a commercial laundry or textile rental service company or any other commercial entity:

To provide laundry service to hospitals, clinics, nursing homes, other health care facilities, or veterinary hospitals or clinics;

To clean textile products supplied to industrial or commercial users of the products on a rental basis; or

To clean professional, industrial, or commercial work uniforms;

In the manufacture of health care or veterinary supplies;

In any medical, biological, chemical, engineering, or other such laboratory, including those associated with any academic or research facility;

As water softeners, antiscale agents, or corrosion inhibitors, where such use is in a closed system such as a boiler, air conditioner, cooling tower, or hot water heating system; or

To clean hard surfaces including windows, sinks, counters, floors, ovens, food preparation surfaces, and plumbing fixtures.

This Code section shall not apply to cleaning agents which:

Are manufactured, stored, sold, or distributed for uses other than household laundry detergents or household or commercial dishwashing agents;

Contain phosphorus in an amount not exceeding 0.5 percent by weight which is incidental to manufacturing; or

Contain phosphorus in an amount not exceeding 8.7 percent by weight and which are intended for use in a commercial or household dishwashing machine.

This Code section shall not apply to any natural or commercial fertilizers.

Local governments shall be responsible for enforcement of the provisions of this Code section within their jurisdictions.

Any person violating the provisions of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-27.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 319, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 12; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1203, § 1.)

Law reviews.

-
For note on 1989 enactment of this Code section, see 6 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 160 (1989). For note on 1990 amendment of this Code section, see 7 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 227 (1990).

12-5-28. Annual reports by division.

Annual reports shall be made and filed by the division with the Governor and members of the General Assembly.

(Ga. L. 1964, p. 416, § 15.)

12-5-29. Sewage and waste disposal; withdrawal, diversion, or impoundment of surface waters; certificates required for vessels with marine toilets; conditions for transfer of surface water from one river basin to another.

It shall be unlawful to use any waters of the state for the disposal of sewage, industrial wastes, or other wastes, or to withdraw, divert, or impound any surface waters of the state, except in such a manner as to conform to and comply with this article and all rules, regulations, orders, and permits established under this article and applicable to the waters involved.

No person, without first securing from the division a permit, shall:

Construct, install, or modify any system for disposal of sewage, industrial wastes, or other wastes, or any extension or addition thereto, when the disposal of the sewage, industrial wastes, or other wastes constitutes pollution as defined in this article;

Increase the volume or strength of any sewage, industrial wastes, or other wastes in excess of permissive discharges specified under any existing permit; or

Construct or use any new outlet for the discharge of any sewage, industrial wastes, or other wastes into the waters of the state when such discharge constitutes pollution as defined in this article.

As applied to the waters of Allatoona Lake, Lake Blackshear, Lake Blue Ridge, Clarks Hill Lake, Hartwell Lake, Lake Sidney Lanier, Lake Oconee, Lake Seminole, Lake Sinclair, Richard B. Russell Lake, Walter F. George Reservoir, and West Point Lake, except as otherwise provided in the federal Clean Water Act of 1977, P.L. 95-217, as now or hereafter amended, it shall be unlawful for any person to operate or float a vessel having a marine toilet as the term is defined in Code Section 52-7-3 unless such marine toilet only discharges into a holding tank as the term is defined in Code Section 52-7-3; and it shall further be unlawful to operate or float such a vessel, whether moored or not, unless it has a certificate for such holding tank issued by the department affixed thereto.

The director shall not authorize any new water pollution control discharge permit which if granted would permit water drawn from one river basin to be deposited into another river basin in the discharge of sewerage, industrial waste, treated waste water, or other wastes unless for both the basin of origin and receiving river basin unless:

The director has assessed all waters in order to identify those waters for which applicable effluent limitations are not sufficiently stringent to allow such waters to meet applicable water quality standards and has established total limitations for the pollutants which cause the waters to fail to achieve such water quality standards;

The director has established water quality standards for the nearest downstream lake as provided in Code Section 12-5-23.1; and

All applicable provisions of this article and all rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this article are met.

All new permits issued after January 1, 2001, discharging in excess of 3 million gallons per day shall be required to meet a minimum standard of 0.30 milligrams of phosphorus per liter of waste water.

The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to the reissuance of existing permits, permits for the expansion of existing facilities, permits for the withdrawal of water for agricultural use, or permits for mining activities which use water for the transportation of materials.

If any treatment plant is not in compliance with permit requirements at any time between July 1, 1996, and July 1, 1997, the division shall be authorized to decrease the permitted capacity of such treatment plant in an amount up to 10 percent of the permitted capacity and may issue a new permit based upon such amount of decrease.

(Ga. L. 1957, p. 629, § 6; Ga. L. 1964, p. 416, § 10; Ga. L. 1977, p. 368, § 6; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1343, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1218, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 459, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1618, § 2.)

Cross references.

- Littering waters,

§

16-7-43

.

Discharging into waters of state substances dangerous to navigation or property, T. 52, C. 8.

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, a comma was deleted following "day" in paragraph (d)(2).

Law reviews.

-
For article criticizing impressionistic approach to water use classification established by permit system, see 23 Mercer L. Rev. 603 (1972). For article surveying Georgia cases dealing with environment, natural resources, and land use from June 1977 through May 1978, see 30 Mercer L. Rev. 75 (1978).
For note, "Regulation of Artificial Lakes and Recreational Subdivisions in Georgia," recommending methods for future regulation, see 8 Ga. St. B.J. 580 (1972). For review of 1996 water resources legislation, see 13 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 60 (1996).

12-5-29.1. Combined sewer overflow; plans for elimination or treatment of sewage overflow; penalties.

As used in this Code section, the term:

"Combined sewer overflow" or "CSO" means a sewage system so designed or constructed as to allow surface-water runoff to enter the conduit carrying sewage, industrial waste, or other waste and, when such conduit exceeds its maximum capacity, allows a discharge which bypasses the normal treatment works integral to such sewage system and allows untreated or incompletely treated sewage, industrial waste, or other waste to flow, directly or indirectly, into the waters of this state.

"Sewage overflow" means that untreated sewage, industrial waste, or other waste which is discharged when a CSO exceeds its maximum capacity so that such material bypasses the normal treatment works integral to such sewage system and flows untreated or incompletely treated into the waters of this state.

Any person who owns or operates a CSO in this state on July 1, 1990, shall devise and submit to the director for approval a detailed plan to eliminate sewage overflow or to treat or control sewage overflow so that discharges flowing from such CSO shall not cause a violation of water quality standards in the receiving stream or permit limits for publicly owned waste-water treatment facilities with combined sewer overflows established by the division or by the federal Environmental Protection Agency under the provisions of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act amendments of 1972, 33 U.S.C. Section 1251 and following, as amended by the Clean Water Act of 1977 (P.L. 95-217). Compliance with such standards and permit limits shall be required for all CSO discharges under design conditions, including without limitation storm event frequency, intensity, and duration and treatment technology, as determined by the director based on a site-specific determination of water quality impacts resulting from said discharges.

The plan required by subsection (b) of this Code section shall include, as a minimum, provision for realistic implementation of means to eliminate sewage overflow or effectuate treatment of overflow to meet or exceed such water quality standards in accordance with the following schedules:

Any person who submitted a plan pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section prior to August 1, 1990, shall implement such plan so that construction is substantially complete and operational to meet the water quality standards in the receiving stream or permit limits as defined by the director not later than December 31, 1993; and

Any person who did not submit a plan pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section prior to August 1, 1990, shall comply with the following schedule:

The director shall define the design conditions of subsection (b) of this Code section by December 31, 1991, using information provided by CSO owners and information collected by the director;

The CSO owners shall prepare approvable plans and specifications by October 1, 1992, and, based on the director's approval of plans and specifications by December 31, 1992, the owners shall commence construction of the approved CSO facilities by April 1, 1993; and

The construction shall be substantially complete and operational to meet the water quality standards in the receiving stream or permit limits as defined by the director by December 31, 1995.

The owner of any combined sewer overflow system which discharges into the Chattahoochee River or its tributaries who failed to implement an approved plan by December 31, 1995, shall, in lieu of the liability and penalties provided in Code Sections

12-5-51

through

12-5-53

, pay a civil penalty in the amount of $10,000.00 per day until the construction is completed but not later than October 1, 1997, after which date the penalty shall be increased to $100,000.00 per day until construction is completed; provided, however, that if such person owns or operates two separate combined sewer overflow systems, he or she shall pay a separate penalty on the second such system in the amount of $10,000.00 per day until construction is completed, but not later than July 1, 1998, after which date the penalty shall be increased to $100,000.00 per day for such system. On and after the dates the penalties for each such system increase to $100,000.00 per day, the owner or operator shall be subject to the liabilities and penalties provided in Code Sections

12-5-51

through

12-5-53

with regard to the respective system.

In addition to the penalties provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the owner or operator of a combined sewer overflow system shall not permit any additional sewer connections to such system until construction has been completed.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-29.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1216, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1386, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1775, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1618, § 3.)

Law reviews.

-
For note on 1993 amendment of this Code section, see 10 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 60 (1993). For review of 1996 water resources legislation, see 13 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 60 (1996).

12-5-30. Permits for construction, modification, or operation of facilities which discharge pollutants into waters; permits for discharge of dredged or fill material into waters and wetlands; participation in National Pollution Discharge Elimination System.

Any person who owns or operates a facility of any type or who desires to erect, modify, alter, or commence operation of a facility of any type which results or will result in the discharge of pollutants from a point source into the waters of the state shall obtain from the director a permit to make such discharge. Any person desiring to erect, modify, alter, or commence operation of a facility which will result in such discharge but which is not discharging such pollutants as of July 1, 1974, must obtain such permit prior to the discharge of same. Any person who is operating a facility which results in such discharge as of July 1, 1974, may continue to make such discharge pending final action by the director on the application for such discharge permit, provided that such application has been filed with the director by September 29, 1974; and provided, further, that such discharge does not present an immediate health hazard to the public. The director, under the conditions he prescribes, may require the submission of such plans, specifications, and other information as he deems relevant in connection with the issuance of such permits. The director may, after public notice and opportunity for public hearing, issue a permit which authorizes the person to make such discharge, upon condition that such discharge meets or will meet, pursuant to any schedule of compliance included in such permit, all water quality standards, effluent limitations, and all other requirements established pursuant to this article.

Any person desiring to erect or modify facilities or commence or alter an operation of any type which will result in the discharge of pollutants from a nonpoint source into the waters of the state, which will render or is likely to render such waters harmful to the public health, safety, or welfare, or harmful or substantially less useful for domestic, municipal, industrial, agricultural, recreational, or other lawful uses, or for animals, birds, or aquatic life, shall obtain a permit from the director to make such discharge. Any person desiring to erect, modify, alter, or commence operation of a facility which will result in such discharge but which is not discharging such pollutants as of July 1, 1974, must obtain such permit prior to the discharge of same. The director, under the conditions he prescribes, may require the submission of such plans, specifications, and other information as he deems relevant in connection with the issuance of such permits. The director may, after public notice and opportunity for public hearing, issue a permit which authorizes the person to make such discharge upon condition that such discharge meets or will meet, pursuant to any schedule of compliance included in such permit, all water quality standards, effluent limitations, and all other requirements established pursuant to this article.

The director is authorized to require as conditions in permits issued under subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section the achievement of effluent limitations established pursuant to this article. In imposing effluent limitations as conditions in such permits, the director shall base his determination upon the assessment of technology and processes unrelated to the quality of the receiving waters of this state. Effluent limitations required as conditions of such permits shall be achieved in the shortest reasonable period of time consistent with state law and the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, as amended. The director is further authorized to set schedules of compliance and include such schedules within the terms and conditions of such permits for the discharge of such pollutants into the waters of the state and to prescribe terms and conditions for such permits to assure compliance with applicable effluent limitations and water quality criteria established pursuant to this article, including, but not limited to, requirements concerning recording, reporting, monitoring, entry, and inspection to the extent permissible under this article, and such other requirements as are consistent with the purposes of this article.

Each permit issued under subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section shall have a fixed term set by the director consistent with the federal Clean Water Act of 1977, P.L. 95-217, as now or hereafter amended but not to exceed ten years. Upon expiration of such permit, a new permit may be issued by the director after review by him in accordance with such guidelines as he shall prescribe; after notice and opportunity for public hearing; and upon condition that the discharge meets or will meet, pursuant to any schedule of compliance included in such permit, all applicable water quality standards, effluent limitations, and all other requirements established pursuant to this article. The director is authorized to include in permits issued under this subsection such terms and conditions as are authorized under subsections (a) and (c) of this Code section. The director may revoke, suspend, or modify any permit issued under this subsection or subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section, for cause, including but not limited to the following:

Violation of any condition of the permit;

Obtaining a permit by misrepresentation or failure to disclose fully all relevant facts;

Change in any condition that requires either a temporary or permanent reduction or elimination of the permitted discharge.

In the event of modification, suspension, or revocation of a permit, the director shall serve written notice of such action on the permit holder and shall set forth in such notice the reason for such action.

Notwithstanding any other provision in this Code section, the director may issue permits, after notice and opportunity for public hearings, for the discharge of dredged or fill material into the waters and wetlands of the state, in accordance with the standards and criteria set forth in Section 404 of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972, 33 U.S.C. Section 1344, as amended by the Clean Water Act of 1977 (P.L. 95-217), upon receiving delegation of such authority, except that this subsection shall not authorize the director to issue permits with respect to projects under review by the United States Army Corps of Engineers as to which a public hearing has been held before July 1, 1974. In administering such a program, the director is empowered with the authority to take such action as is set forth in Section 404(h)(1)(A) through (H) of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972, 33 U.S.C. Section 1344, as amended by the Clean Water Act of 1977 (P.L. 95-217). No person covered by this subsection shall discharge dredged or fill material into the waters and wetlands of this state except in a manner which complies with this article and Section 404 of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972, 33 U.S.C. Section 1344, as amended by the Clean Water Act of 1977 (P.L. 95-217).

The director may issue general permits for discharges of pollutants from categories of point sources which are subject to the same permit limitations and conditions. Such general permits may be issued without individual applications. At the discretion of the director, numeric effluent limitations and effluent monitoring provisions may be included in general permits or best management practices may be substituted for numeric effluent limitations without a showing that it would be infeasible to include effluent limitations; provided, however, that the director shall incorporate the provisions related thereto as provided in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subsection (a) of Code Section 12-7-6 into any general permit issued for the discharge of storm water from construction activity.

It is declared to be the public policy of this state, in furtherance of its responsibility to protect the public health, safety, and well-being of its citizens and to protect and enhance the quality of its environment, to prevent or mitigate where possible discharges of sediment into the waters of the state. The General Assembly declares its intent to partially fund the execution of the public policy set forth in this subsection and Chapter 7 of this title by and through the division with permit fees for the National Pollution Discharge Elimination System general permit or permits for storm-water runoff from construction activities as is now in effect or as may be amended or reissued in the future pursuant to the state's authority to implement the same through federal delegation under the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, as amended, 33 U.S.C. Section 1251, et seq., and subsection (f) of this Code section. Such fees shall be administered by the division pursuant to rules and regulations established by the board pursuant to paragraph (5) of subsection (a) of Code Section 12-5-23. The General Assembly further declares its intent that the amount of funds provided by such permit fees will not be utilized for any purposes other than the administration of Chapter 7 of this title by the division or a local issuing authority and the administration of the state general permit defined in Code Section 12-7-3 by the division, which purposes shall specifically include without limitation the study and report required by Code Section 12-7-21; provided, however, that nothing in this subsection shall be construed so as to allow the department to retain any funds required by the Constitution of Georgia to be paid into the state treasury; provided, further, that the department shall comply with all provisions of Part 1 of Article 4 of Chapter 12 of Title 45, the "Budget Act," except Code Section 45-12-92, prior to expending any funds derived from such permit fees.

(Ga. L. 1964, p. 416, § 10; Ga. L. 1973, p. 1288, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 599, §§ 8-11; Ga. L. 1978, p. 2245, § 7; Ga. L. 1986, p. 350, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 12; Ga. L. 1995, p. 150, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 224, § 4; Ga. L. 2007, p. 739, § 2/SB 200.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1986, a comma was inserted following "entry" in the fourth sentence of subsection (c).

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2007, p. 739,

§

5/SB 200, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the 2007 amendment shall only become effective on January 1, 2009, upon the ratification of a resolution at the November, 2008, state-wide general election that amends the Constitution so as to authorize the General Assembly to provide by general law for the creation and comprehensive regulation of infrastructure development districts. If such resolution is not so ratified, this Act shall not become effective and shall stand repealed in its entirety on January 1, 2009. The constitutional amendment proposed in Ga. L. 2007, p. 775, was defeated in the general election on November 4, 2008.

U.S. Code.

- The Federal Water Pollution Control Act, as amended, and the federal Clean Water Act of 1977, as amended, are codified as 33 U.S.C.

§

1251 et seq.

Law reviews.

-
For article criticizing impressionistic approach to water use classification established by permit system, see 23 Mercer L. Rev. 603 (1972). For article surveying Georgia cases dealing with environment, natural resources, and land use from June 1977 through May 1978, see 30 Mercer L. Rev. 75 (1978).
For note, "Regulation of Artificial Lakes and Recreational Subdivisions in Georgia," recommending methods for future regulation, see 8 Ga. St. B.J. 580 (1972). For note on the 1995 amendment of this Code section, see 12 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 39 (1995). For note on the 2003 amendment of this Code section, see 20 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 244 (2003). For note on 2007 amendment of this Code section, see 24 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 255 (2007).